Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Withdrawal.

§79-4-15.20.
Withdrawal of foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may not withdraw from this state until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may apply for a certificate of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

That it is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

That it revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in this state;

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on him under paragraph (3) of this subsection; and

A commitment to notify the Secretary of State in the future of any change in its mailing address.

After the withdrawal of the corporation is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State under the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure is service on the foreign corporation. Upon receipt of process, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the foreign corporation at the mailing address set forth in its application for withdrawal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 44, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

A former § 79-4-15.20 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.20, eff from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2004] also provided for the withdrawal of foreign corporations.

The 2012 amendment in (b)(4), substituted “paragraph” for “subdivision” preceding “(3)”, and inserted “of this subsection” thereafter; and substituted “the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure” for “this section” following “Secretary of State under” in (c).

Withdrawal of foreign corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-383.

It would appear that this section [Code 1942, § 5309-234] was enacted to prevent a corporation from withdrawing from the State of Mississippi after a citizen of this state acquires a right to sue the corporation, and that jurisdiction conferred upon a foreign corporation through the provisions of this section is predicated upon the fact that the cause of action accrued during the time that the corporation was qualified to do business within the State of Mississippi, regardless of the origin or genesis of the acts which gave rise to the cause of action, that is, whether or not they accrued or had their effect within or without the State of Mississippi. Hyde Constr. Co. v. Koehring Co., 321 F. Supp. 1193, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13680 (D. Miss. 1969).

Where successor corporation agreed to assume the liabilities and obligations of the predecessor corporation which were due from the state, the successor corporation was liable for municipal privilege taxes in view of the statute providing for withdrawal of foreign corporation from the state and also in view of statute providing that a tax is a debt due by corporation and may be recovered by action. General Contract Corp. v. Bailey, 218 Miss. 484, 67 So. 2d 485, 1953 Miss. LEXIS 564 (Miss. 1953).

General rule that withdrawal of foreign corporation from state does not revoke local agent’s authority to receive service of process or deprive local courts of jurisdiction of actions arising out of business done within the state cannot be extended to actions not incidental to or connected with business done in state by such foreign corporation. Walters v. Curtis Candy Co., 172 Miss. 187, 159 So. 560, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 126 (Miss. 1935).

Plea to jurisdiction of consumer’s action against foreign corporate manufacturer for injuries allegedly caused by glass in candy made by such manufacturer and purchased from retail merchant held properly sustained, where service was had on corporation’s former agent after corporation’s withdrawal from state and it did not appear that candy allegedly causing injuries was in any way connected with the business done by manufacturer within the state. Walters v. Curtis Candy Co., 172 Miss. 187, 159 So. 560, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 126 (Miss. 1935).

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 266- 268,
457- 461.

8A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 122:45-122:47, 122:51.